Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-535
Cities of the primary class; city council; terms.

The members of the city council of a city of the primary class shall be elected at the general city election as provided in section 15-301. The term of each council member shall be four years or until his or her successor is elected and qualified.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 131.